Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Death Investigations
45-16-27.
When inquest to be held; special situations; coroner’s fee; issuance of subpoenas; cost of copying; limited disclosure of photographs.

Coroners shall require an inquest to be conducted in their respective counties as follows:

When any individual dies under any circumstances specified in paragraphs (1) through (11) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-16-24; provided, however, that an inquest shall not be required to be held, although the coroner shall be authorized to hold an inquest, under the following circumstances:

When upon the completion of the medical examiner’s inquiry the peace officer in charge and the medical examiner are satisfied that, even though death resulted from violence, no foul play was involved. In this event, the peace officer in charge and the medical examiner shall make a written report of their investigation and findings to the division as set forth in Code Section 45-16-32, and upon their recommendation, the coroner shall make and file a proper death certificate;

When there is sufficient evidence to establish the cause and manner of death, even though the medical examiner’s inquiry revealed that death resulted from foul play;

When no demand for an inquest is made within 30 days after the filing of the death certificate. However, if such demand is made by the party or parties affected by the death, the coroner shall be authorized to hold the inquest;

When upon the completion of the medical examiner’s inquiry the medical examiner and peace officer in charge are sufficiently satisfied that death resulted from natural causes, and that medical examiner or coroner is willing to and does sign and file a proper death certificate, and no demand for an inquest is made within 30 days thereafter;

When after full and complete investigation no evidence of foul play is found in cases of hidden cause of death which fall under the jurisdiction of the coroner. The coroner shall be authorized to sign the death certificate on the basis of the information given to him or her in the reports of the peace officer in charge and the medical examiner, provided that, in such hidden causes of death, after a complete investigation, if sufficient medical history is obtained by the coroner, the peace officer in charge, or the medical examiner to disclose the cause of death and if the attending physician will sign the death certificate, such cases shall not come under the jurisdiction of the coroner; provided, further, that, if there are sufficient competent eyewitnesses to an act in the opinion of the peace officer in charge, such cases shall not come under the jurisdiction of the coroner; or

In cases of deaths of personnel in the armed forces of the United States government resulting from airplane disasters involving airplanes of the armed forces, including crashes or explosions, which deaths shall not come under the jurisdiction of the coroner. It shall be the responsibility of the peace officer in charge to notify the proper armed forces of the United States government immediately of such airplane crashes or explosions in order that they may send their trained forces to the scene for investigation. It shall be the duty of the peace officer in charge, when notified of such crashes or explosions, to proceed to the scene and guard the area in such manner that no bodies or parts of said airplanes shall be moved or disturbed until the arrival of proper investigating officers from the armed forces of the United States government;

When an inmate of a state hospital or a state, county, or city penal institution dies unexpectedly without an attending physician or as a result of violence. The chief medical examiner or his or her designee, regional medical examiner, or local medical examiner shall perform all medical examiners’ inquiries. The coroner, in those counties in which such office has not been replaced by a local medical examiner, shall hold an inquest after receiving the written reports as set forth in Code Section 45-16-32;

When ordered by a court in connection with a medical examiner’s inquiry ordered by that court pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 45-16-24; or

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection, no individual shall be deemed to have died unattended by a physician when the death occurred while he or she was a patient of a hospice licensed under Article 9 of Chapter 7 of Title 31.

(D.1)

In cases of deaths resulting from an accident involving any civil aircraft, it shall be the responsibility of the peace officer in charge to notify the National Transportation Safety Board or the Federal Aviation Administration of such accident, to proceed to the scene and guard the area in such manner that no bodies, wreckage, cargo, or mail shall be moved or disturbed until authorized by a representative of the National Transportation Safety Board or the Federal Aviation Administration except to the extent necessary to remove individuals injured or trapped, to protect the wreckage from further damage, or to protect the public from injury. When it is necessary to move aircraft wreckage, mail, or cargo, sketches, descriptive notes, and photographs shall be made, if possible, of the original positions and condition of the wreckage and any significant impact marks. The coroner or medical examiner shall assist investigators from the National Transportation Safety Board or the Federal Aviation Administration as authorized by federal law;

On and after January 1, 2007, coroners shall be entitled to an investigation fee of $175.00 where no jury is impaneled or a fee of $250.00 where a jury is impaneled and shall be paid upon receipt of a monthly statement to the county treasury. A deputy coroner shall receive the same fee as the coroner for the performance of services in place of the coroner and shall be paid upon receipt of a monthly statement to the county treasury. Such fee shall be paid within ten days after receipt of the coroner’s monthly statement by the county where the investigation or inquest is held except in counties where the coroner receives an annual salary established through local legislation, in which case no fee shall be imposed upon the county by such salaried coroner or deputy coroner.

(b.1)

A local Act providing for the compensation of a coroner shall remain in full force and effect, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. In those instances where such local Act provides for a salary in an amount less than the amount of compensation such coroner would be entitled to pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the coroner may elect to be compensated pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section in lieu of the compensation provided for by local Act. The coroner shall provide written notice to the county governing authority of such election no later than October 1 of any year to be effective January 1 of the next calendar year.

When a coroner or a medical examiner or a medical examiner from the office of chief medical examiner, as established in Code Section 35-3-153, conducts an investigation into the death of an individual, the coroner, medical examiner, or medical examiner from the office of chief medical examiner shall be authorized to issue subpoenas to compel the production of any books, records, including but not limited to medical records from hospitals, medical clinics, psychiatric hospitals, physicians’ offices, chiropractors’ offices, and any other health care delivery facility, or papers relevant to the cause of death including without limitation AIDS confidential information as defined by Code Section 31-22-9.1. Any books, records, or papers received by the coroner, medical examiner, or medical examiner from the office of chief medical examiner pursuant to the subpoena must be regarded as confidential information and privileged and not subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50. The actual costs of copying any books, records, or papers for the purposes of responding to a subpoena under this subsection shall be paid out of county funds to the person or entity required to respond to that subpoena, and the governing authority of the county of which that coroner or county medical examiner is a public officer shall pay those costs within 30 days after a bill therefor is submitted to the county. A medical examiner from the office of chief medical examiner shall pay the costs of copying from state funds within 30 days after a bill therefor is submitted to the state.

Autopsy photographs shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50; provided, however, that this subsection shall have no application to the disclosure of such photographs to law enforcement agencies and prosecutors for law enforcement purposes or, in closed criminal investigations, to medical schools, medical facilities, and physicians for medical purposes; to individuals who have secured a written release from the deceased’s next of kin; or to the next of kin. It shall be the responsibility of the next of kin to show proof of the familial relationship. For purposes of securing a written release or when access to the photographs is requested by the next of kin, the deceased’s next of kin shall be:

The spouse of the deceased if living;

If there is no living spouse of the deceased, an adult child of the deceased;

If there is no living spouse or adult child, a parent of the deceased;

If there is no living spouse, adult child, or parent, a sibling of the deceased;

If there is no living spouse, adult child, parent, or sibling of the deceased, a grandparent of the deceased;

If none of the above are living, an uncle of the deceased;

If none of the above are living, an aunt of the deceased; or

If none of the above are living, a first cousin of the deceased.

A superior court may, in closed criminal investigations, order the disclosure of such photographs upon findings in writing that disclosure is in the public interest and that it outweighs any privacy interest that may be asserted by the deceased’s next of kin. In any such action, the court shall review the photographs in question in camera and may condition any disclosure on such measurers as the court may deem necessary to accommodate the interests of the parties before it.

Crime scene photographs and video recordings, including photographs and video recordings created or produced by a state or local agency or by a perpetrator or suspect at a crime scene, which depict or describe a deceased person in a state of dismemberment, decapitation, or similar mutilation including, without limitation, where the deceased person’s genitalia are exposed, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50; provided, however, that this subsection shall not prohibit disclosure of such material to the deceased’s next of kin or to an individual who has secured a written release from the next of kin. It shall be the responsibility of the next of kin to show proof of the familial relationship. For purposes of such access, the deceased’s next of kin shall be:

The spouse of the deceased if living;

If there is no living spouse of the deceased, an adult child of the deceased; or

If there is no living spouse or adult child, a parent of the deceased.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, in the case of closed criminal investigations a superior court may order the disclosure of such photographs or video recordings upon findings in writing that disclosure is in the public interest and outweighs any privacy interest that may be asserted by the deceased person’s next of kin. In making such determination, the court shall consider whether such disclosure is necessary for public evaluation of governmental performance, the seriousness of the intrusion into the family’s right to privacy, and whether such disclosure is the least intrusive means available considering the availability of similar information in other public records. In any such action, the court shall review the photographs in question in camera with the custodian of crime scene materials present and may condition any disclosure on such condition as the court may deem necessary to accommodate the interests of the parties.

Prior to releasing any crime scene material described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the custodian of such material shall give the deceased person’s next of kin at least two weeks’ notice. No court shall order a disclosure pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection which would disregard or shorten the duration of such notice requirement.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all undisclosed material which is in the custody of a state or local agency on May 20, 2010, and to any such material which comes into the custody of a state or local agency after such date.

This subsection shall not apply to disclosure of crime scene material to counsel representing a convicted defendant in a habeas corpus action pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title 9, on an extraordinary motion for new trial under Code Section 5-5-40 or 5-5-41, or in a federal habeas corpus action under Section 2254 or 2255 of Title 28 of the United States Code for the purpose of preparing to file or litigating such proceedings. Counsel may disclose such materials to his or her client and any expert or investigator assisting counsel but shall not otherwise disseminate such materials, except to the extent they may be necessary exhibits in court proceedings. A request pursuant to this paragraph shall clearly state that such request is being made for the purpose of preparing to file and litigate proceedings enumerated in this paragraph.

The director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Board of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the viewing of materials described in paragraph (1) of this subsection by bona fide credentialed members of the press.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 537; Code 1863, § 566; Code 1868, § 630; Code 1873, § 589; Code 1882, § 589; Ga. L. 1893, p. 116, § 1; Penal Code 1895, § 1255; Ga. L. 1901, p. 44, § 1; Penal Code 1910, § 1337; Code 1933, § 21-202; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 4; Ga. L. 1961, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 543, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 611, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1073, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1594, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 722, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 350, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, §§ 7, 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 869, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 667, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 568, § 12/SB 450; Ga. L. 2010, p. 259, § 3/HB 1322; Ga. L. 2013, p. 739, § 2/SB 226; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340; Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 6-2/HB 249; Ga. L. 2022, p. 409, § 2/SB 496.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the second sentence of subsection (b.1).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “individual” for “person” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(4);
substituted “shall be authorized” for “is authorized” near the end of paragraph (a)(1) and in the second sentence of subparagraph (a)(1)(C); in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “paragraphs (1) through (10)” for “paragraphs (1) through (8)” and substituted “inquest shall not be required” for “inquest is not required” in the middle; added a comma following “45-16-32” in the second sentence of subparagraph (a)(1)(A); in subparagraph (a)(1)(D.1), substituted “individuals” for “persons” near the end of the first sentence and substituted “When” for “Where” at the beginning of the second sentence; inserted “or her” near the middle of the second sentence of subparagraph (a)(1)(E); and substituted “he or she” for “the person” near the end of paragraph (a)(4).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “through (11)” for “through (10)” in the middle of paragraph (a)(1).

Cross references.

Sudden or unusual death of inmate, §

42-5-7

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, “camera and” was substituted “camera, and” in the undesignated paragraph of subsection (d).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “May 20, 2010,” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” in paragraph (e)(4).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 259, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Meredith Emerson Memorial Privacy Act’.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 259, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that photographs or video recordings of certain crime scene photos depict the deceased in graphic and often disturbing fashion. Such photographs or video may depict or describe the deceased nude, grossly dismembered, or decapitated. As such photographs or video recordings are highly sensitive depictions of the deceased which, if viewed, copied, or publicized, could result in trauma, sorrow, humiliation, or emotional injury to the immediate family of the deceased, as well as injury to the memory of the deceased. The legislature finds that the existence of certain publications and the Internet and the proliferation of personal computers throughout the world encourages and promotes the wide dissemination of photographs and video recordings 24 hours a day and that widespread unauthorized dissemination of such images would subject the immediate family of the deceased to continuous injury.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of the limited disclosure and viewing of certain crime scene photographs and videos by bona fide members of the press, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Bureau of Investigation, Rule 92-5-.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 143 (2017).

45-16-27.1.
Medical examination of unexpected or unexplained death of person under seven years of age.

Where a coroner or county medical examiner has been notified pursuant to paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-16-24 of the death of any person after birth but before seven years of age whose death is unexpected or unexplained, the medical examiner’s inquiry required by Code Section 45-16-25 shall include an autopsy unless that inquiry shows that such death was expected or explainable with a reasonable degree of medical certainty.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply notwithstanding subsection (b) of Code Section 45-16-22 or any other provision of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-27.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 enactment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 268 (1990).

45-16-28.
Performance of autopsy when not required under Code Section 45-16-24.

In the case of death of any person under such circumstances as would not require a medical examiner’s inquiry under Code Section 45-16-24, any physician who is duly licensed under the laws of this state or any other state having licensing requirements equal to or greater than those imposed by this state shall be deemed to have been legally authorized to perform an autopsy upon the body of a deceased person when such autopsy has been consented to by the person assuming custody of the body for the purposes of burial, such as the husband, wife, father, mother, child, guardian, next of kin, or, in the absence of any of the foregoing, a friend of such deceased person charged by law with the responsibility of burial. If two or more of such persons assume custody of the body, the consent of one of them shall be deemed sufficient legal authorization for the performance of the autopsy.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-29.
Removal of body generally.

No person shall move or authorize the removal of any body from the place where the same is found until the investigation is completed and such removal is authorized by the coroner or medical examiner present at such investigation; or, if no such coroner or medical examiner is present, the peace officer shall authorize such removal; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply to the removal of a body where the death occurred while the person was a patient of a hospice licensed under Article 9 of Chapter 7 of Title 31. If the death resulted from an accident involving the operation of civil aircraft, no body shall be removed until authorized by the representative of the National Transportation Safety Board or the Federal Aviation Administration.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1073, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997’ ”.

45-16-30.
Transport of body across state line.

No person shall move or transport a body across a Georgia state line until the investigation of the case and the medical examiner’s inquiry are complete and until the removal of the body is authorized by the coroner or medical examiner. Except when the conduct is a violation of Code Section 16-10-94, any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $1,000.00 or 60 days in jail, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997.’ ”

45-16-31.
Authorization of removal of body for convenience of examination; investigation of premises before removal.

When the deceased body lies in a place inconvenient for holding a medical examiner’s inquiry, the medical examiner or coroner shall be allowed to remove the body to the autopsy room of the nearest public hospital or morgue. If neither the coroner nor the medical examiner is immediately available, the peace officer may assume the authority to have the body moved to such facility. When such facility is not reasonably available, the
body may be removed to such other suitable place as may be designated by the coroner or the medical examiner or by the peace officer in charge in the absence of the coroner or medical examiner.
If the peace officer in charge is present, no such body shall be removed until photographs of the body and surrounding premises have been made and a thorough investigation of the premises has been made by the proper investigating authorities.

History.

Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 540; Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 166, § 2; Code 1868, § 4039; Code 1873, § 4110; Code 1882, § 4110; Penal Code 1895, § 1269; Penal Code 1910, § 1351; Code 1933, § 21-206; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 7; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 9; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

History of Code section.

It appears that § 4110, which would be in the history of this section, was inadvertently left out of the 1882 Code.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on local government law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 199 (2016).

45-16-32.
Report of examination and investigation; maintenance of copies; verification of foul play by forensic laboratory; transmittal of copies of reports to district attorneys.

The medical examiner and coroner shall complete a report of each medical examiner’s inquiry and coroner’s investigation and shall maintain permanent records of such reports. The coroner or county medical examiner may file all original reports with the clerk of the superior court of the county. In cases where such report indicates a suspicion of foul play, the medical examiner and peace officer in charge shall transmit any specimens, samples, or other evidence to a forensic laboratory for analysis. In cases where reports indicating foul play are verified by the forensic laboratory, the laboratory shall provide a completed lab report to the appropriate prosecuting attorney where the acts or events leading to the death occurred.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 417, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 869, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 574, § 2/HB 1095.

45-16-33.
Coroner to make inquest upon completion of examination and verification.

Upon the completion of the medical examiner’s inquiry by the medical examiner, as provided in Code Section 45-16-24, and after verification by the division when such verification is required, the coroner shall then make an inquest into the death of such deceased person as provided in Code Section 45-16-27.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 10; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 7; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-34.
Issuance of subpoenas; administration of oath to witnesses.

The coroner shall issue subpoenas to or otherwise compel the attendance of witnesses; and he shall administer to such witnesses the following oath:

“The evidence that you shall give this inquest on behalf of the state concerning the death of
_______________
(or a person unknown, as the case may be) shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help you God.”

When a coroner conducts an inquest into the death of an individual, he shall be authorized to issue subpoenas to compel production of any books, records, or papers relevant to the cause of death. Any books, records, or papers received by the coroner pursuant to the subpoena must be regarded as confidential information and privileged and not subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50. The actual costs of copying any books, records, or papers for the purpose of responding to a coroner’s subpoena under this subsection shall be paid out of county funds to the person or entity required to respond to that subpoena, and the governing authority of the county of which that coroner is a public officer shall pay those costs within 30 days after a bill therefor is submitted to the county; provided, however, that the county shall not be responsible for duplication costs under $25.00.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 539; Code 1863, § 4007; Code 1868, § 4035; Code 1873, § 4106; Code 1882, § 4106; Penal Code 1895, § 1263; Penal Code 1910, § 1345; Code 1933, § 21-207; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 11; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1594, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-35.
Coroner to require material witnesses to enter into recognizance; petition for issuance of warrant for arrest of suspected person.

If the inquest discloses facts which lead or may lead to the prosecution of any person for the homicide of the person for whom the inquest is held, the coroner shall require all witnesses who testify to facts material to the issues involved in such prosecution to enter into a recognizance to appear in the superior court of the county in which the inquest is held and to give evidence against the defendant in such prosecution; and he shall also petition for the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person suspected of the homicide, which warrant shall be returnable as other warrants.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 539; Code 1863, § 4008; Code 1868, § 4036; Code 1873, § 4107; Code 1882, § 4107; Penal Code 1895, § 1264; Penal Code 1910, § 1346; Code 1933, § 21-208; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 12; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-36.
Impaneling of jury to hold inquest; compensation of jurors.

The coroner shall summon and impanel five jurors and one alternate juror to hold an inquest, which jurors shall decide the verdict by a majority vote. The first grand jury impaneled at the fall term of the superior courts of the several counties shall fix the compensation of said jurors for the next succeeding year but such compensation shall not be less than $5.00 nor more than $25.00 per diem. It shall be the duty of the coroner or other person discharging the duties of the coroner to give a certificate of the fact of such service to each juror. Upon presentation of such certificate to the proper fiscal authority of the county in which the inquest is held, such fiscal authority shall pay the juror for his services.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 538; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 1893, p. 116, § 3; Penal Code 1895, § 1257; Penal Code 1910, § 1339; Code 1933, § 21-209; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 204, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 13; Ga. L. 1969, p. 761, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 718, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-37.
When jury to be impaneled; jury not required to view body.

No coroner’s jury shall be impaneled until the investigation is completed and copies of the reports of the medical examiner and the peace officer in charge are received by the coroner. The jury is not required to view the body.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 9; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-38.
Issuance of precept to sheriff to summon inquest jury; form.

Whenever a coroner receives notice of the death of any person within the limits of the county of which he is coroner, which death occurred under circumstances which make it his duty, under the law, to hold an inquest, he shall make out a precept directed to the sheriff or any constable of the county having jurisdiction requiring him to summon a jury of inquest selected from the grand jury or traverse jury lists of the last excused term of the superior court of such county to appear before the coroner at the time and place mentioned in the precept, which precept may be in the following form:

State of Georgia County To the sheriff or any lawful constable of said county, Greeting: You are required immediately to summon six persons of said county, chosen from the lists of grand jurors and traverse jurors of the last excused term of the superior court of said county, to be and appear before me, the undersigned, coroner of the county aforesaid, at , in said county, on the day of at : . M. of that same day, then and there to inquire of, do, and execute all such things as in behalf of the state shall be given them in charge concerning the death of (or a person unknown, as the case may be), and be you then and there with this precept to certify what you have done in the premises and further to do whatsoever else may in behalf of the state be enjoined upon you. Given under my hand and seal, this the day of , in the year of our Lord . Coroner (L.S.)

Click to view

Such precept shall be immediately executed by the sheriff or constable in whose hands it may be placed; and, if the services of the sheriff or a constable cannot be conveniently obtained, the coroner may summon the jury himself.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 537; Code 1863, § 4002; Code 1868, § 4030; Code 1873, § 4101; Code 1882, § 4101; Penal Code 1895, § 1259; Penal Code 1910, § 1341; Code 1933, § 21-210; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 14; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

45-16-39.
Oath for foreperson and jury of inquest.

The following oath shall be administered to the foreman of the jury by the coroner:

“You, as foreman of the inquest, shall diligently inquire and true presentment make, on behalf of the State of Georgia, how and in what manner
_______________
(or a person deceased, unknown, as the case may be) came to his death and of such other matters relating to the same as shall be lawfully required of you, according to evidence, so help you God.”

The remainder of the jury shall be sworn by the coroner as follows:

“The same oath which the foreman of this inquest has taken on his part each of you shall observe and keep upon your part, so help you God.”

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 538; Code 1863, § 4005; Code 1868, § 4033; Code 1873, § 4104; Code 1882, § 4104; Penal Code 1895, § 1261; Penal Code 1910, § 1343; Code 1933, § 21-212; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 16; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-40.
Coroner’s charge to jury; power of jury.

The coroner shall charge the jurors to declare, and they shall so declare, whether the person for whom the inquest is held died by:

Homicide;

Suicide;

Accident;

Natural causes; or

Undetermined causes

and all of the circumstances relating to the death.

The jury shall have full and unrestricted power to inquire and pass upon all the matters and things thus given them in charge and they shall have this power even if the whole or a part of the charge is omitted.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 538; Code 1863, § 4006; Code 1868, § 4034; Code 1873, § 4105; Code 1882, § 4105; Penal Code 1895, § 1262; Penal Code 1910, § 1344; Code 1933, § 21-213; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 17; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-41.
Defaulting juror to be fined by coroner.

Any juror failing to attend and serve on a coroner’s inquest after being duly summoned may be fined by the coroner in a sum not exceeding $100.00 to be levied and collected by execution issued by the coroner unless such defaulting juror shall file in the office of the judge of the probate court a good and sufficient excuse for the default to be judged by the next probate court held thereafter.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 538; Code 1863, § 4003; Code 1868, § 4031; Code 1873, § 4102; Code 1882, § 4102; Penal Code 1895, § 1260; Penal Code 1910, § 1342; Code 1933, § 21-211; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 15; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-42.
Offering in evidence of results of examination.

In all inquests the results of the medical examiner’s inquiry performed shall be offered in evidence either by oral testimony of the medical examiner or by introduction of a copy of the report filed with the director of the division, as verified in the cases requiring verification. The jury shall be free to reach a verdict in accord or discord with such evidence but in all cases such evidence must be presented to them for their consideration.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 18; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-43.
[Reserved] Receipt as evidence of records, findings, and reports of medical examiners’ inquiries.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 88/HB 24, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737, effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this Code section.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 19; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

45-16-44.
Disposition of bodies after examination and inquest; payment of burial expenses from deceased’s estate.

After the medical examiner’s inquiry and inquest have been completed, the dead body shall be delivered to the person legally entitled thereto for burial. If no person claims the body, it shall be turned over to the coroner of the county where death occurred for disposition as provided by law. If the deceased has an estate out of which burial expenses can be paid, either in whole or in part, such estate shall be taken for such purpose before any expense under this Code section is imposed upon any county.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 20; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-45.
Authority of coroners and medical examiners to disinter bodies.

In order to implement this article, coroners are authorized to disinter any body already buried and, like a sheriff, to command the power of the county for that purpose. Medical examiners,
other than local medical examiners, may likewise exercise such authority in any case wherein such authority is granted by an order of the judge of the superior court of the county. Such orders may be granted by judges of the superior courts, in their discretion, upon petition of any medical examiner other than a local medical examiner.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 567; Code 1868, § 631; Code 1873, § 590; Code 1882, § 590; Penal Code 1895, § 1258; Penal Code 1910, § 1340; Code 1933, § 21-205; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 21; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

Cross references.

Penalty for disinterment of body without good grounds, §

31-21-42

.

45-16-46.
Obtaining blood sample when person unable to consent; analysis of blood specimens; certified report.

When any person has been admitted to a hospital or morgue as a result of any casualty and for any reason whatsoever is unable to give his or her consent to the taking of a sample of blood for analytical purposes, the coroner or peace officer in charge of the investigation of the circumstances surrounding the casualty may notify a medical examiner for the purpose of obtaining a blood sample to test for the presence of intoxicating substances or in the case of a dead body and where appropriate for the presence of infectious agents. The blood may be drawn by the medical examiner or at the medical examiner’s direction. The medical examiner or his or her designee shall be entitled to a fee set in accordance with Code Section 35-3-151 for performing these services, which fee shall be paid in the same manner as set out in Code Section 45-16-22. The peace officer may also request any licensed physician, nurse, emergency medical technician, medical or laboratory technician, or other qualified person to withdraw blood for purposes of this Code section, in which event such person shall incur no civil or criminal liability. The medical examiner or the peace officer in charge shall submit the blood specimens to the division for analysis; and a report shall be submitted by the division to the submitting officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 437, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 561, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 959, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 829, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 10.

Cross references.

Chemical tests for alcohol or drugs in blood of person charged with driving under influence of alcohol or drugs, §

40-6-392

.

Operation of watercraft while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, §

52-7-12

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997.’ ”

45-16-47.
Penalty for violation of article.

Except as provided in Code Section 45-16-30, any person who violates this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 9; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-48.
Coroner’s employment of court reporter.

A coroner may be authorized to employ, at his discretion, a court reporter who is certified under Article 2 of Chapter 14 of Title 15, “The Georgia Court Reporting Act,” to record the proceedings of any inquest.
The cost of acquiring the services of a certified court reporter shall be paid from the funds of the county where the inquest is held.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.